Vermont statutes. Title 13 Crimes and Criminal Procedure
Chapter 229. Bail and Recognizances

§ 7551.
Imposition of bail, secured appearance bonds, and appearance bonds.

Bonds; generally. A bond given by a person charged with a criminal offense or by a witness in a criminal prosecution under section 6605 of this title, conditioned for the appearance of the person or witness before the court in cases where the offense is punishable by fine or imprisonment, and in appealed cases, shall be taken to the Criminal Division of the Superior Court where the prosecution is pending and shall remain binding upon parties until discharged by the court or until sentencing. The person or witness shall appear at all required court proceedings.

Limitation on imposition of bail, secured appearance bonds, and appearance bonds.

Except as provided in subdivision (2) of this subsection, no bail, secured appearance bond, or appearance bond may be imposed:

at the initial appearance of a person charged with a misdemeanor if the person was cited for the offense in accordance with Rule 3 of the Vermont Rules of Criminal Procedure; or

at the initial appearance or upon the temporary release pursuant to Rule 5(b) of the Vermont Rules of Criminal Procedure of a person charged with a violation of a misdemeanor offense that is eligible for expungement pursuant to subdivision 7601(4)(A) of this title.

In the event the court finds that imposing bail is necessary to mitigate the risk of flight from prosecution for a person charged with a violation of a misdemeanor offense that is eligible for expungement pursuant to subdivision 7601(4)(A) of this title, the court may impose bail in a maximum amount of $200.00.

This subsection shall not be construed to restrict the court’s ability to impose conditions on such persons to reasonably mitigate the risk of flight from prosecution or to reasonably protect the public in accordance with section 7554 of this title.

HISTORY:

Amended 2001, No. 124 (Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. June 5, 2002; amended 2017, No. 62, § 1; 2017, No. 164 (Adj. Sess.), § 1.

§ 7552.
Repealed. 2001, No. 124 (Adj. Sess.), § 13, eff. June 5, 2002.

§ 7553.
Release in cases punishable by life imprisonment.

A person charged with an offense punishable by life imprisonment when the evidence of guilt is great may be held without bail. If the evidence of guilt is not great, the person shall be bailable in accordance with section 7554 of this title.

HISTORY:

Added 1987, No. 102, § 1; amended 1993, No. 143 (Adj. Sess.), § 1.

Particular cases.

In holding defendant, who was charged with sexual assault, without bail, the trial court did not err in finding that the evidence of guilt was great, because the victim clearly testified that although the encounter was initially consensual, she asked defendant to “stop” once he became violent, after which he nonetheless tried to forcefully initiate anal sex. State v. Blodgett, 2021 VT 47, 257 A.3d 232, 2021 Vt. LEXIS 54 (Vt. 2021).

Trial court properly denied defendant’s motion to reconsider its decision to hold defendant without bail, as defendant did not call his witness or present any other evidence to the trial court, and in its hold-without-bail decision, the trial court considered several factors, including the substantial weight of the evidence, defendant’s pronounced criminal history, evidence of his conduct in the police cruiser, evidence of threats against the complainant, and defendant’s ties to the community and limited financial resources. State v. Tarbell, 2021 VT 68, 261 A.3d 1123, 2021 Vt. LEXIS 85 (Vt. 2021).

It was error to order defendant to be held without bail because while defendant purchased a gun and planned to purchase at least one more, planned to conduct surveillance at a high school, sent messages on social media to the effect that he planned to commit a shooting at the school, wrote at length in his journal that he currently planned to commit such an act at some future time, kept lists of the items that he needed before actually committing a shooting at the school, many of which he did not have, and researched the school calendar to select an optimal date for the planned shooting, he took no action so proximate to the commission of a school shooting as to constitute an attempt, but engaged only in these preparatory acts. State v. Sawyer, 2018 VT 43, 207 Vt. 638, 187 A.3d 377, 2018 Vt. LEXIS 39 (Apr. 11, 2018) (mem.).

Trial court erred in holding defendant without bail without considering whether any of the statutory factors weighed in favor of defendant’s pretrial release. State v. Collins, 2017 VT 85, 205 Vt. 632, 177 A.3d 528, 2017 Vt. LEXIS 103 (2017), app. dismissed,
(Vt. 2021) (mem.).

Trial court did not err in deciding to hold defendant, who was charged with second-degree murder, without bail after concluding that releasing her on bail with a condition that she stay with one of the proposed custodians would not sufficiently limit flight risk and risk to public safety. Defendant’s mother-in-law was already supervising a probationer, whose probation might be affected if defendant moved in, and the mother-in-law’s son had a criminal record; defendant’s brother and his adult family members had criminal records and in the case of the family members did not testify as to their availability. State v. Shores, 2017 VT 37, 204 Vt. 630, 168 A.3d 471, 2017 Vt. LEXIS 47 (2017).

There was sufficient evidence that defendant’s guilt was great for purposes of the statute regarding release on bail in cases punishable by life imprisonment when defendant’s claim that her husband shot himself was inconsistent with the physical evidence and when defendant was the only other person in her home the night the husband was shot. State v. Shores, 2017 VT 37, 204 Vt. 630, 168 A.3d 471, 2017 Vt. LEXIS 47 (2017).

When defendant was charged with attempted first-degree murder and kidnapping, the trial court properly denied bail under the statute dealing with cases punishable by life imprisonment, as the weight of the evidence was enough to give rise to a presumption for incarceration and the trial court considered several of the factors under the pretrial release statute, including the seriousness of the charges and the violent threats by defendant and the fact that his violent threats and actions involved innocent bystanders. State v. Ford, 2015 VT 127, 200 Vt. 650, 130 A.3d 862, 2015 Vt. LEXIS 103 (2015).

Trial court properly denied bail to defendant, who was charged with second-degree aggravated domestic assault. It considered his prior violations of abuse prevention orders, his additional prior convictions and violations of probation, the repeated threatening and demeaning text messages that defendant sent to his wife, and the current high emotional state of the couple’s relationship in the midst of a separation and divorce, even though the trial court did not feel that risk of flight was a major concern and counted defendant’s employment and stable residence with his mother as positive factors. State v. Baker, 2015 VT 62, 199 Vt. 639, 116 A.3d 1192, 2015 Vt. LEXIS 40 (2015) (mem.).

Interview transcript contained statements by the victim that sufficiently approximated an oath and thus was admissible as a sworn statement in the context of a bail review hearing. Any flaws in the interview process itself went to the weight that the evidence should be given at trial. State v. Whittemore, 2015 VT 16, 196 Vt. 608, 2005 Vt. LEXIS 441 (2005) (mem.).

Remand was required when the trial court denied defendant bail. First, the trial court treated the State’s post-hearing filings as evidence without allowing defendant any opportunity to react; second, because it made no findings regarding defendant’s risk of flight or risk to safety, and did not conduct any hearing on conditions of release, it completely withheld its discretion as to whether defendant should be released. State v. Harper, 2015 VT 24, 196 Vt. 618, 2008 Vt. LEXIS 223 (2008) (mem.).

There was no merit to defendant’s argument that his denial of bail violated federal due process. A presumption of incarceration under the statute regarding release in cases punishable by life imprisonment did not violate due process. State v. Brillon, 2010 VT 48, 188 Vt. 537, 996 A.2d 1187, 2010 Vt. LEXIS 44 (2010) (mem.).

Defendant, who was charged with second-degree domestic assault and faced a maximum penalty of life in prison based on his alleged status as a habitual offender, was properly ordered held without bail while awaiting retrial. The evidence of guilt was great, as defendant had been previously convicted under much of the evidence that would likely be presented at retrial, and there was ample support for the conclusion that defendant, who had a history of assaultive behavior toward the complainant while under conditions of release, would not comply with conditions of release and would pose a risk to the public. State v. Brillon, 2010 VT 48, 188 Vt. 537, 996 A.2d 1187, 2010 Vt. LEXIS 44 (2010) (mem.).

While it was true that defendant was not charged under the habitual offender statute—a statute that acted as a sentencing enhancement, not as a separate criminal violation—and that the felonies with which defendant was charged were not in themselves punishable by life imprisonment, this did not change the fact that defendant was charged with several felonies that, for him, were punishable by life imprisonment under the habitual offender statute. The plain language of the statute governing release in cases punishable by life imprisonment unambiguously applied to defendant, and the rule of lenity was therefore inapplicable. State v. Pellerin, 2010 VT 26, 187 Vt. 482, 996 A.2d 204, 2010 Vt. LEXIS 25 (2010).

Trial court properly found that the evidence of guilt was great and that defendant could therefore be held without bail. The State submitted numerous affidavits regarding the alleged felony dispensation of regulated drugs to a minor, and a search revealed Vicodin at defendant’s home; regarding the lewd and lascivious conduct charge, the trial court found strong and admissible evidence that defendant was guilty of this charge based on an affidavit describing defendant’s acts of lifting the victim’s shirt and pulling down the victim’s underpants to take photographs of her vagina and buttocks. State v. Pellerin, 2010 VT 26, 187 Vt. 482, 996 A.2d 204, 2010 Vt. LEXIS 25 (2010).

Trial court properly exercised its discretion to deny bail when it found that defendant had a long history of sexual offenses and used his home to facilitate his proximity to his target victims of young girls; that defendant appeared to suffer from compulsive and antisocial conduct that endangered the public; and that there remained a moderate risk of flight if defendant, who had allegedly stated that he “could not go back to jail,” were released on bail. State v. Pellerin, 2010 VT 26, 187 Vt. 482, 996 A.2d 204, 2010 Vt. LEXIS 25 (2010).

Defendant was not entitled to be released from custody pending the outcome of a hearing on whether he was bailable in the discretion of the trial court. Where a trial court has determined that the evidence indicating that a defendant committed a crime punishable by life imprisonment is great, and that decision is supported by the record, the trial court may order the defendant held without bail pending the outcome of a hearing on whether the defendant may be released on conditions. State v. Falzo, 2009 VT 22, 185 Vt. 616, 969 A.2d 694, 2009 Vt. LEXIS 21 (2009) (mem.).

In a case where defendant was charged with sexual assault and lewd and lascivious conduct with a child, there was no reason to dispute the trial court’s finding in denying defendant bail that the evidence of his guilt was great. Defendant offered no support for his argument that an oral statement attested to by the complainant at the end of her statement was less admissible than a written affidavit attested to by her at the bottom of the statement; moreover, even if the complainant’s interview were not admitted, the trial court could still rely on defendant’s own sworn admissions that he and the complainant engaged in sexual intercourse and other sexual acts. State v. Bushey, 2009 VT 12, 185 Vt. 597, 969 A.2d 119, 2009 Vt. LEXIS 9 (2009) (mem.).

There was no merit to defendant’s argument that a hearing was not a bail review. The trial court specifically stated that it was a bail review hearing; moreover, the trial court considered not just the evidence against defendant, but also the testimony offered by defendant’s witness as well as the factors bearing on whether the court could allow bail and conditions of release even though defendant was not entitled to bail as a matter of right. State v. Bushey, 2009 VT 12, 185 Vt. 597, 969 A.2d 119, 2009 Vt. LEXIS 9 (2009) (mem.).

Record supported the trial court’s decision to hold defendant, who was charged with domestic assault and being a habitual offender, without bail. Although the victim’s testimony at the hearing was inconsistent with her earlier statements, her testimony did not convincingly undermine her earlier account, which accurately matched the state of the crime scene, and a detective testified that in his experience, the victim’s hoarse voice, red eyes, and discolored neck were consistent with strangulation. State v. Hardy, 2008 VT 119, 184 Vt. 618, 965 A.2d 478, 2008 Vt. LEXIS 140 (2008) (mem.).

Denial of bail to defendant charged with aggravated sexual assault on a nine-year-old girl did not deny defendant of procedural due process. State v. Blackmer, 160 Vt. 451, 631 A.2d 1134, 1993 Vt. LEXIS 75 (1993).

To meet substantive due process requirements, bail cannot be denied in order to inflict pretrial punishment, pretrial detention cannot be excessive in relation to regulatory goal, and interests served by the detention must be legitimate and compelling. State v. Blackmer, 160 Vt. 451, 631 A.2d 1134, 1993 Vt. LEXIS 75 (1993).

§ 7553a.
Acts of violence; denial of release on bail.

A person charged with an offense that is a felony, an element of which involves an act of violence against another person, may be held without bail when the evidence of guilt is great and the court finds, based upon clear and convincing evidence, that the person’s release poses a substantial threat of physical violence to any person and that no condition or combination of conditions of release will reasonably prevent the physical violence.

HISTORY:

Added 1993, No. 143 (Adj. Sess.), § 2.

Pursuant to 1993, No. 143 (Adj. Sess.), § 6, this section, as added by section 2 of the act, shall take effect upon adoption of Proposal 7 (amendment of section 40 of Chapter II of the Vermont Constitution). Proposal 7 was voted on at the general election on Nov. 8, 1994, and took effect Dec. 13, 1994.

§ 7553b.
Right to speedy trial if bail is denied.

Except in the case of an offense punishable by death or life imprisonment, if a person is held without bail prior to trial, the trial of the person shall be commenced not more than 60 days after bail is denied.

If the trial is not commenced within 60 days and the delay is not attributable to the defense, the court shall immediately schedule a bail hearing and shall set bail for the person.

HISTORY:

Added 1993, No. 143 (Adj. Sess.), § 3.

Pursuant to 1993, No. 143 (Adj. Sess.), § 6, this section, as added by section 3 of the act, shall take effect upon adoption of Proposal 7 (amendment of section 40 of Chapter II of the Vermont Constitution). Proposal 7 was voted on at the general election on Nov. 8, 1994, and took effect Dec. 13, 1994.

§ 7554.
Release prior to trial.

Release; conditions of release. Any person charged with an offense, other than a person held without bail under section 7553 or 7553a of this title, shall at his or her appearance before a judicial officer be ordered released pending trial in accordance with this section.

The defendant shall be ordered released on personal recognizance or upon the execution of an unsecured appearance bond in an amount specified by the judicial officer unless the judicial officer determines that such a release will not reasonably mitigate the risk of flight from prosecution as required. In determining whether the defendant presents a risk of flight from prosecution, the judicial officer shall consider, in addition to any other factors, the seriousness of the offense charged and the number of offenses with which the person is charged. If the officer determines that the defendant presents a risk of flight from prosecution, the officer shall, either in lieu of or in addition to the methods of release in this section, impose the least restrictive of the following conditions or the least restrictive combination of the following conditions that will reasonably mitigate the risk of flight of the defendant as required:

Place the defendant in the custody of a designated person or organization agreeing to supervise him or her if the defendant is charged with an offense that is not a nonviolent misdemeanor or nonviolent felony as defined in 28 V.S.A. § 301.

Place restrictions on the travel or association of the defendant during the period of release.

Require the defendant to participate in an alcohol or drug treatment program. The judicial officer shall take into consideration the defendant’s ability to comply with an order of treatment and the availability of treatment resources.

Upon consideration of the defendant’s financial means, require the execution of a secured appearance bond in a specified amount and the deposit with the clerk of the court, in cash or other security as directed, of a sum not to exceed 10 percent of the amount of the bond, such deposit to be returned upon the appearance of the defendant as required.

Upon consideration of the defendant’s financial means, require the execution of a surety bond with sufficient solvent sureties, or the deposit of cash in lieu thereof.

Impose any other condition found reasonably necessary to mitigate the risk of flight as required, including a condition requiring that the defendant return to custody after specified hours.

Place the defendant in a program of community-based electronic monitoring in accordance with section 7554d of this title.

If the judicial officer determines that conditions of release imposed to mitigate the risk of flight will not reasonably protect the public, the judicial officer may impose in addition the least restrictive of the following conditions or the least restrictive combination of the following conditions that will reasonably ensure protection of the public:

Place the defendant in the custody of a designated person or organization agreeing to supervise him or her if the defendant is charged with an offense that is not a nonviolent misdemeanor or nonviolent felony as defined in 28 V.S.A. § 301.

Place restrictions on the travel, association, or place of abode of the defendant during the period of release.

Require the defendant to participate in an alcohol or drug treatment program. The judicial officer shall take into consideration the defendant’s ability to comply with an order of treatment and the availability of treatment resources.

Impose any other condition found reasonably necessary to protect the public, except that a physically restrictive condition may only be imposed in extraordinary circumstances.

Suspend the officer’s duties in whole or in part if the defendant is a State, county, or municipal officer charged with violating section 2537 of this title and the court finds that it is necessary to protect the public.

Place the defendant in a program of community-based electronic monitoring in accordance with section 7554d of this title.

A judicial officer may order that a defendant not harass or contact or cause to be harassed or contacted a victim or potential witness. This order shall take effect immediately, regardless of whether the defendant is incarcerated or released.

Judicial considerations in imposing conditions of release. In determining which conditions of release to impose:

In subdivision (a)(1) of this section, the judicial officer, on the basis of available information, shall take into account the nature and circumstances of the offense charged; the weight of the evidence against the accused; the accused’s employment; financial resources, including the accused’s ability to post bail; the accused’s character and mental condition; the accused’s length of residence in the community; and the accused’s record of appearance at court proceedings or of flight to avoid prosecution or failure to appear at court proceedings.

In subdivision (a)(2) of this section, the judicial officer, on the basis of available information, shall take into account the nature and circumstances of the offense charged; the weight of the evidence against the accused; and the accused’s family ties, employment, character and mental condition, length of residence in the community, record of convictions, and record of appearance at court proceedings or of flight to avoid prosecution or failure to appear at court proceedings. Recent history of actual violence or threats of violence may be considered by the judicial officer as bearing on the character and mental condition of the accused.

Order. A judicial officer authorizing the release of a person under this section shall issue an appropriate order containing a statement of the conditions imposed, if any; shall inform such person of the penalties applicable to violations of the conditions of release; and shall advise him or her that a warrant for his or her arrest will be issued immediately upon any such violation.

Review of conditions.

A person for whom conditions of release are imposed and who is detained as a result of his or her inability to meet the conditions of release or who is ordered released on a condition that he or she return to custody after specified hours, or the State, following a material change in circumstances, shall, within 48 hours following application, be entitled to have the conditions reviewed by a judge in the court having original jurisdiction over the offense charged. A party applying for review shall be given the opportunity for a hearing. Unless the conditions of release are amended as requested, the judge shall set forth in writing or orally on the record a reasonable basis for continuing the conditions imposed. In the event that a judge in the court having original jurisdiction over the offense charged is not available, any Superior judge may review such conditions.

A person for whom conditions of release are imposed shall, within five working days following application, be entitled to have the conditions reviewed by a judge in the court having original jurisdiction over the offense charged. A person applying for review shall be given the opportunity for a hearing. Unless the conditions of release are amended as requested, the judge shall set forth in writing or orally on the record a reasonable basis for continuing the conditions imposed. In the event that a judge in the court having original jurisdiction over the offense charged is not available, any Superior judge may review such conditions.

Amendment of order. A judicial officer ordering the release of a person on any condition specified in this section may at any time amend the order to impose additional or different conditions of release, provided that the provisions of subsection (d) of this section shall apply.

Definition. The term “judicial officer” as used in this section and section 7556 of this title shall mean a clerk of a Superior Court or a Superior Court judge.

Admissibility of evidence. Information stated in, or offered in connection with, any order entered pursuant to this section need not conform to the rules pertaining to the admissibility of evidence in a court of law.

Forfeiture. Nothing contained in this section shall be construed to prevent the disposition of any case or class of cases by forfeiture of collateral security if such disposition is authorized by the court.

Forms. The Court Administrator shall establish forms for appearance bonds, secured appearance bonds, surety bonds, and for use in the posting of bail. Each form shall include the following information:

The bond or bail may be forfeited in the event that the defendant or witness fails to appear at any required court proceeding.

The surety or person posting bond or bail has the right to be released from the obligations under the bond or bail agreement upon written application to the judicial officer and detention of the defendant or witness.

The bond will continue through sentencing in the event that bail is continued after final adjudication.

Juveniles. Any juvenile between 14 and 16 years of age who is charged with a listed crime as defined in subdivision 5301(7) of this title shall appear before a judicial officer and be ordered released pending trial in accordance with this section within 24 hours following the juvenile’s arrest.

HISTORY:

Added 1967, No. 337 (Adj. Sess.), § 4; amended 1969, No. 125, § 12; 1973, No. 193 (Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. April 9, 1974; 1987, No. 102, § 2; 1989, No. 293 (Adj. Sess.), § 1; 1993, No. 143 (Adj. Sess.), § 4; 2001, No. 124 (Adj. Sess.), § 2, eff. June 5, 2002; 2003, No. 73 (Adj. Sess.), § 6, eff. March 1, 2004; 2005, No. 63, § 10; 2005, No. 193 (Adj. Sess.), § 10; 2007, No. 108 (Adj. Sess.), § 1; 2007, No. 169 (Adj. Sess.), § 2; 2009, No. 154 (Adj. Sess.), § 118; 2015, No. 43, § 2; 2015, No. 125 (Adj. Sess.), § 1; 2015, No. 153 (Adj. Sess.), § 18; 2017, No. 164 (Adj. Sess.), § 3.

§ 7554a.
Approval of fidelity companies and agents; duty of Court Administrator.

The Court Administrator, after consultation with the Commissioner of Financial Regulation, may approve an entity that is licensed or authorized under the provisions of 8 V.S.A. chapter 111, and any agent who is licensed under the provisions of 8 V.S.A. chapter 131, to act as a surety, or on behalf of a surety, in this State to execute a bond in the form established by the Court Administrator under subsection 7554(i) of this title, or post bail as required as a condition of release, and if so approved, the entity or agent shall not need to be approved by any court, judicial officer, or any other person.

HISTORY:

Added 1993, No. 233 (Adj. Sess.), § 83, eff. June 21, 1994; amended 1995, No. 180 (Adj. Sess.), § 38(a); 2001, No. 124 (Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. June 5, 2002; 2011, No. 78 (Adj. Sess.), § 2, eff. April 2, 2012.

§ 7554b.
Home detention program.

Definition. As used in this section, “home detention” means a program of confinement and supervision that restricts a defendant to a preapproved residence continuously, except for authorized absences, and is enforced by appropriate means of surveillance and electronic monitoring by the Department of Corrections. The court may authorize scheduled absences such as for work, school, or treatment. Any changes in the schedule shall be solely at the discretion of the Department of Corrections. A defendant who is on home detention shall remain in the custody of the Commissioner of Corrections with conditions set by the court.

Procedure. At the request of the court, the Department of Corrections, or the defendant, the status of a defendant who is detained pretrial in a correctional facility for inability to pay bail after bail has been set by the court may be reviewed by the court to determine whether the defendant is appropriate for home detention. The review shall be scheduled upon the court’s receipt of a report from the Department determining that the proposed residence is suitable for the use of electronic monitoring. A defendant held without bail pursuant to section 7553 or 7553a of this title shall not be eligible for release to the Home Detention Program on or after June 1, 2018. At arraignment or after a hearing, the court may order that the defendant be released to the Home Detention Program, provided that the court finds placing the defendant on home detention will reasonably assure his or her appearance in court when required and the proposed residence is appropriate for home detention. In making such a determination, the court shall consider:

the nature of the offense with which the defendant is charged;

the defendant’s prior convictions, history of violence, medical and mental health needs, history of supervision, and risk of flight; and

any risk or undue burden to other persons who reside at the proposed residence or risk to third parties or to public safety that may result from such placement.

Failure to comply. The Department of Corrections may revoke a defendant’s home detention status for an unauthorized absence or failure to comply with any other condition of the Program and shall return the defendant to a correctional facility.

Credit for time served. A defendant shall receive credit for a sentence of imprisonment for time served in the Home Detention Program.

HISTORY:

Added 2009, No. 146 (Adj. Sess.), § D4; amended 2017, No. 62, § 11; 2017, No. 164 (Adj. Sess.), § 7.

Particular cases.

Given its finding that home detention would be inappropriate, the trial court properly denied electronic monitoring. State v. Ford, 2015 VT 127, 200 Vt. 650, 130 A.3d 862, 2015 Vt. LEXIS 103 (2015).

In denying defendant’s motion for pretrial home detention, the trial court improperly considered the nature of the offense multiple times against defendant and gave no weight to defendant’s prior convictions, history of violence, medical and mental health needs, history of supervision, and risk of flight, which tended to support home detention. Furthermore, it improperly grounded its decision on the way that the Department of Corrections had chosen to discharge its responsibilities under the program. State v. Whiteway, 2014 VT 34, 196 Vt. 629, 95 A.3d 1004, 2014 Vt. LEXIS 33 (2014) (mem.).

§ 7554c.
Pretrial risk assessments; needs screenings.

The objective of a pretrial needs screening is to obtain a preliminary indication of whether a person has a substantial substance abuse or mental health issue that would warrant a subsequent court order for a more detailed clinical assessment.
(a) (1) The objective of a pretrial needs screening is to obtain a preliminary indication of whether a person has a substantial substance abuse or mental health issue that would warrant a subsequent court order for a more detailed clinical assessment.

Participation in a needs screening pursuant to this section does not create any entitlement for the screened person.

Except as provided in subdivision (2) of this subsection, a judge may request that a pretrial services coordinator perform a risk assessment that assesses risk of flight for a person who is arrested, lodged, and unable to post bail within 24 hours of lodging.
(b) (1) Except as provided in subdivision (2) of this subsection, a judge may request that a pretrial services coordinator perform a risk assessment that assesses risk of flight for a person who is arrested, lodged, and unable to post bail within 24 hours of lodging.

A person charged with an offense for which registration as a sex offender is required pursuant to chapter 167, subchapter 3 of this title or an offense punishable by a term of life imprisonment shall not be eligible under this section.

Participation in risk assessment or needs screening shall be voluntary and a person’s refusal to participate shall not result in any criminal legal liability to the person.

In the event a screening cannot be obtained prior to arraignment, the needs screening shall be conducted as soon as practicable.

A person who qualifies pursuant to subdivision (1) of this subsection and who has an additional pending charge or a violation of probation shall not be excluded from being offered a needs screening unless the other charge is a listed crime.

Any person charged with a criminal offense, a person who is the subject of a youthful offender petition pursuant to 33 V.S.A. § 5280, or a person 18 years of age or older who is the subject of a delinquency petition pursuant to 33 V.S.A. § 5201, except those persons identified in subdivision (2) of this subsection, may choose to engage with a pretrial services coordinator.

The results of the risk assessment and needs screening shall be provided to the person and his or her attorney, the prosecutor, and the court. Pretrial services coordinators may share information only within the limitations of subsection (e) of this section.

At arraignment, the court may order a person who is eligible to engage with a pretrial services coordinator under subdivision (b)(6) of this section to do the following:
(d) (1) At arraignment, the court may order a person who is eligible to engage with a pretrial services coordinator under subdivision (b)(6) of this section to do the following:

meet with a pretrial services coordinator on a schedule set by the court;

participate in a needs screening with a pretrial services coordinator; and

participate in a clinical assessment by a substance abuse or mental health treatment provider and follow the recommendations of the provider.

The court may order the person to engage in pretrial services. Pretrial services may include the pretrial services coordinator:

supporting the person in meeting conditions of release imposed by the court, including the condition to appear for judicial proceedings; and

connecting the person with community-based treatment programs, rehabilitative services, recovery supports, and restorative justice programs.

If possible, the court shall set the date and time for the clinical assessment at arraignment. In the alternative, the pretrial services coordinator shall coordinate the date, time, and location of the clinical assessment and advise the court, the person and his or her attorney, and the prosecutor.

An order authorized in subdivision (1) or (2) of this subsection shall be in addition to any conditions of release permitted by law and shall not limit the court in any way. Failure to comply with a court order authorized by subdivision (1) or (2) of this subsection shall not constitute a violation of section 7559 of this title.

This section shall not be construed to limit a court’s authority to impose conditions pursuant to section 7554 of this title.

Information obtained from the person during the risk assessment or needs screening shall be exempt from public inspection and copying under the Public Records Act and, except as provided in subdivision (2) of this subsection, only may be used for determining bail, conditions of release, and appropriate programming for the person in the pending case. The information a pretrial services coordinator may report is limited to whether a risk assessment indicates risk of nonappearance, whether further substance use assessment or treatment is indicated, whether mental health assessment or treatment is indicated, whether a person participated in a clinical assessment, and whether further engagement with pretrial services is recommended, unless the person provides written permission to release additional information. Information related to the present offense directly or indirectly derived from the risk assessment, needs screening, or other conversation with the pretrial services coordinator shall not be used against the person in the person’s criminal or juvenile case for any purpose, including impeachment or cross-examination. However, the fact of participation or nonparticipation in risk assessment or needs screening may be used in subsequent proceedings. The immunity provisions of this subsection apply only to the use and derivative use of information gained as a proximate result of the risk assessment, needs screening, or other conversation with the pretrial services coordinator.
(e) (1) Information obtained from the person during the risk assessment or needs screening shall be exempt from public inspection and copying under the Public Records Act and, except as provided in subdivision (2) of this subsection, only may be used for determining bail, conditions of release, and appropriate programming for the person in the pending case. The information a pretrial services coordinator may report is limited to whether a risk assessment indicates risk of nonappearance, whether further substance use assessment or treatment is indicated, whether mental health assessment or treatment is indicated, whether a person participated in a clinical assessment, and whether further engagement with pretrial services is recommended, unless the person provides written permission to release additional information. Information related to the present offense directly or indirectly derived from the risk assessment, needs screening, or other conversation with the pretrial services coordinator shall not be used against the person in the person’s criminal or juvenile case for any purpose, including impeachment or cross-examination. However, the fact of participation or nonparticipation in risk assessment or needs screening may be used in subsequent proceedings. The immunity provisions of this subsection apply only to the use and derivative use of information gained as a proximate result of the risk assessment, needs screening, or other conversation with the pretrial services coordinator.

The person shall retain all of his or her due process rights throughout the risk assessment and needs screening process and may release his or her records at his or her discretion.

All records of information obtained during risk assessment or needs screening shall be stored in a manner making them accessible only to the Director of Pretrial Services and pretrial service coordinators for a period of three years, after which the records shall be maintained as required by sections 117 and 218 of this title and any other State law. The Director of Pretrial Services shall be responsible for the destruction of records when ordered by the court.

The Attorney General’s Office shall:

contract for or otherwise provide the pretrial services described in this section, including performance of risk assessments, needs screenings, and pretrial monitoring services, and

develop pretrial services outcomes following the designated State of Vermont performance accountability framework and, in consultation with the Department of State’s Attorneys and Sheriffs, the Office of the Defender General, the Center for Crime Victim Services, and the Judiciary, report annually on or before December 1 to the General Assembly on services provided and outcome indicators.

HISTORY:

Added 2013, No. 179 (Adj. Sess.), § E.339.1; 2013, No. 195 (Adj. Sess.), § 2, eff. Jan. 1, 2015; amended 2015, No. 12, § 2, eff. May 1, 2015; 2015, No. 140 (Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. May 25, 2016; 2017, No. 61, § 3; 2019, No. 77, § 19, eff. June 19, 2019; 2021, No. 14, § 1, eff. April 29, 2021.